Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-112
Removal from state; termination; notice to Secretary of State.

Every notary public removing from the State of Nebraska shall notify the Secretary of State of such removal. Such a removal shall terminate the term of his office.

Laws 1869, § 12, p. 25;

G.S.1873, p. 496;

Laws 1883, c. 58, § 2, p. 249;

R.S.1913, § 5528;

C.S.1922, § 4824;

C.S.1929, § 64-112;

R.S.1943, § 64-112;

Laws 1945, c. 145, § 9, p. 493;

Laws 1967, c. 396, § 7, p. 1244.